Maryland, session 2025, HB0908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0908*

HOUSE BILL 908
4–401.
Except as provided in § 4–402 of this subtitle, and subject to the venue provisions of
Title 6 of this article, the District Court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction in:
(13) A proceeding for a civil infraction under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1124.4, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article;
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued [pursuant to] IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1124.4, § 21–1134, § 22–612,
or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article shall provide that the person receiving the
citation may elect to stand trial by notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to
stand trial at least 5 days [prior to] BEFORE the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system or a stop sign monitoring system controlled by a political subdivision,
a school bus monitoring camera, a bus lane monitoring system, [or] a noise abatement
monitoring system, OR A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM shall provide
that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, a stop sign monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera,
a bus lane monitoring system, [or] a noise abatement monitoring system, OR A
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM in a case contested in District Court, shall
provide that the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court.
(3) Civil penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring
camera, bus lane monitoring system, [or] a noise abatement monitoring system, OR A
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM that are collected by the District Court

HOUSE BILL 908 3
shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and distributed in
accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, [or] noise abatement monitoring
systems, OR DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEMS, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the [speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring] systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
10–311.
(a) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a traffic control signal
monitoring system in accordance with § 21–202.1 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of § 21–202(h) of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 or § 21–810 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of Title 21,
Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(c) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a school bus monitoring
camera in accordance with § 21–706.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–706
of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(d) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a vehicle height monitoring
system in accordance with § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of a State or
local law restricting the presence of certain vehicles during certain times without
authentication.
(e) A RECORDED IMAGE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE PRODUCED BY A
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–1124.4 OF
THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE IS ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING CONCERNING A
CIVIL CITATION ISSUED UNDER THAT SECTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 21–1124,
§ 21–1124.1, OR § 21–1124.2 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE WITHOUT
AUTHENTICATION.

HOUSE BILL 908
(F) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a bus lane monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–1134 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–1133 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
[(f)] (G) A recorded image of a motor vehicle and any relevant recorded audio
produced by a noise abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring
device in accordance with § 22–612 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 22–602
of the Transportation Article without authentication.
[(g)] (H) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a stop sign monitoring
system in accordance with § 21–707.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–707
of the Transportation Article without authentication.
[(h)] (I) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, DISTRACTED
DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM, school bus monitoring camera, or bus lane monitoring
system or a recorded image and any relevant recorded audio produced by a noise abatement
monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring device is admissible as otherwise
provided by law.
Article – Transportation
21–1124.
(b) This section does not apply to the use of a wireless communication device:
(1) To contact a 9–1–1 system; or
(2) As a text messaging device as defined in § 21–1124.1 of this subtitle.
(c) An individual who is under the age of 18 years may not use a wireless
communication device while operating a motor vehicle.
21–1124.1.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an individual may not use a text
messaging device to write, send, or read a text message or an electronic message while
operating a motor vehicle in the travel portion of the roadway.
(c) This section does not apply to the use of:

HOUSE BILL 908 5
(1) A global positioning system; or
(2) A text messaging device to contact a 9–1–1 system.
21–1124.2.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) Emergency use of a handheld telephone, including calls to:
(i) A 9–1–1 system;
(ii) A hospital;
(iii) An ambulance service provider;
(iv) A fire department;
(v) A law enforcement agency; or
(vi) A first aid squad;
(2) Use of a handheld telephone by the following individuals when acting
within the scope of official duty:
(i) Law enforcement personnel; and
(ii) Emergency personnel;
(3) Use of a handheld telephone as a text messaging device as defined in §
21–1124.1 of this subtitle; and
(4) Use of a handheld telephone as a communication device utilizing
push–to–talk technology by an individual operating a commercial motor vehicle, as defined
in 49 C.F.R. Part 390.5 of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations.
(c) The following individuals may not use a handheld telephone while operating
a motor vehicle:
(1) A driver of a Class H (school) vehicle that is carrying passengers and in
motion; and
(2) A holder of a learner’s instructional permit or a provisional driver’s
license who is 18 years of age or older.
(d) (1) This subsection does not apply to an individual specified in subsection
(c) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 908
(2) A driver of a motor vehicle that is in motion may not use the driver’s
hands to use a handheld telephone other than to initiate or terminate a wireless telephone
call or to turn on or turn off the handheld telephone.
(e) (1) A person convicted of a violation of this section is subject to the
following penalties:
(i) For a first offense, a fine of not more than $75;
(ii) For a second offense, a fine of not more than $125; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of not more than $175.
(2) Points may not be assessed against the individual under § 16–402 of
this article unless the offense contributes to an accident.
21–1124.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGENCY” MEANS A COUNTY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT
IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF THE MARYLAND
VEHICLE LAW OR OF LOCAL TRAFFIC LAWS OR REGULATIONS.
(3) “DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE
WITH ONE OR MORE MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS THAT AUTOMATICALLY PRODUCES
TWO OR MORE PHOTOGRAPHS, TWO OR MORE MICROPHOTOGRAPHS, A VIDEOTAPE,
OR OTHER RECORDED IMAGES OF A MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS OPERATED DURING THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(4) “DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR” MEANS
A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN AGENCY OR A CONTRACTOR THAT OPERATES A
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM.
(5) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR
MORE.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL
OR LEASING COMPANY.
(6) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS A BLACK AND WHITE IMAGE
RECORDED BY A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM:

HOUSE BILL 908 7
(I) ON:
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE, WITH THE
DRIVER’S FACE BLURRED, COMMITTING AN ALLEGED VIOLATION;
2. AT LEAST TWO TIME–STAMPED IMAGES OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT INCLUDE THE SAME STATIONARY OBJECT NEAR THE MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
3. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(7) “VIOLATION” MEANS A VIOLATION OF § 21–1124, § 21–1124.1, OR
§ 21–1124.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY AND PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) (1) (I) A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE USED
IN A COUNTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IF:
1. ITS USE IS AUTHORIZED BY THE COUNTY GOVERNING
BODY BY LOCAL LAW ENACTED AFTER REASONABLE NOTICE AND A PUBLIC
HEARING; AND
2. THE COUNTY HAS DETERMINED THAT THERE IS A
NEED FOR A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM AT THE LOCATION BEING
PROPOSED FOR THE USE OF A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 908
(II) BEFORE A COUNTY MAY USE A DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM ON A STATE HIGHWAY AT A LOCATION WITHIN A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION, THE COUNTY SHALL:
1. OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION;
2. NOTIFY THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION OF THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION’S APPROVAL OF THE USE OF A DISTRACTED
DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM AT THAT LOCATION; AND
3. GRANT THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION 60 DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE COUNTY’S NOTICE TO THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TO
ENACT AN ORDINANCE AUTHORIZING THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION INSTEAD OF
THE COUNTY TO USE A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM AT THAT
LOCATION.
(III) BEFORE ACTIVATING A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING
SYSTEM, THE COUNTY SHALL:
1. PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE LOCATION OF THE
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM ON THE COUNTY’S WEBSITE; AND
2. ENSURE THAT EACH DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM IS PROXIMATE TO A SIGN THAT:
A. INDICATES THAT DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING
SYSTEMS ARE IN USE IN THE AREA; AND
B. IS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MANUAL AND THE
SPECIFICATIONS FOR A UNIFORM SYSTEM OF TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES ADOPTED
BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(IV) 1. A COUNTY THAT AUTHORIZES A PROGRAM OF
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEMS SHALL DESIGNATE AN OFFICIAL OR
EMPLOYEE TO INVESTIGATE AND RESPOND TO QUESTIONS OR CONCERNS ABOUT
THE COUNTY’S DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM PROGRAM.
2. A. THE LOCAL DESIGNEE SHALL REVIEW A
CITATION GENERATED BY A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM IF THE
PERSON WHO RECEIVED THE CITATION REQUESTS REVIEW BEFORE THE DEADLINE
FOR CONTESTING LIABILITY UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 908 9
B. IF THE LOCAL DESIGNEE DETERMINES THAT THE
CITATION IS AN ERRONEOUS VIOLATION, THE LOCAL DESIGNEE SHALL VOID THE
CITATION.
C. IF THE LOCAL DESIGNEE DETERMINES THAT A
PERSON DID NOT RECEIVE NOTICE OF A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION DUE
TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE ERROR, THE LOCAL DESIGNEE MAY RESEND THE CITATION
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION OR VOID THE CITATION.
D. A LOCAL DESIGNEE THAT TAKES ANY ACTION
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSUBSUBPARAGRAPH C OF THIS SUBSUBPARAGRAPH SHALL
NOTIFY THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE ACTION FOR THE PURPOSE OF RESCINDING
ANY ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION.
E. A LOCAL DESIGNEE MAY NOT DETERMINE THAT A
CITATION IS AN ERRONEOUS VIOLATION BASED SOLELY ON THE DISMISSAL OF THE
CITATION BY A COURT.
3. A LOCAL DESIGNEE MAY NOT BE EMPLOYED BY A
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM CONTRACTOR OR HAVE BEEN
INVOLVED IN ANY REVIEW OF A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM
CITATION OTHER THAN REVIEW OF A CITATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
4. ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN QUESTION OR CONCERN
FROM A PERSON, THE LOCAL DESIGNEE SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN ANSWER OR
RESPONSE TO THE PERSON WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME.
5. A COUNTY SHALL MAKE ANY WRITTEN QUESTIONS OR
CONCERNS RECEIVED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AND ANY SUBSEQUENT WRITTEN
ANSWERS OR RESPONSES AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION.
(V) IF A COUNTY MOVES OR PLACES A DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM TO OR AT A LOCATION WHERE A DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM HAD NOT PREVIOUSLY BEEN MOVED OR PLACED, THE COUNTY
MAY NOT ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY THAT DISTRACTED
DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM:
1. UNTIL SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (III)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
2. FOR AT LEAST THE FIRST 15 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER
THE SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED.

HOUSE BILL 908
(2) (I) A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR
SHALL COMPLETE TRAINING BY THE MANUFACTURER OF THE DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM IN THE PROCEDURES FOR SETTING UP AND OPERATING THE
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM.
(II) THE MANUFACTURER SHALL ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE
TO THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR ON COMPLETION OF
THE TRAINING.
(III) THE CERTIFICATE OF TRAINING SHALL BE ADMITTED AS
EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION.
(3) A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL
FILL OUT AND SIGN A DAILY SET–UP LOG FOR A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING
SYSTEM THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING
SYSTEM OPERATOR SUCCESSFULLY PERFORMED OR REVIEWED AND EVALUATED
THE MANUFACTURER–SPECIFIED DAILY SELF–TEST OF THE DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM BEFORE PRODUCING A RECORDED IMAGE;
(II) STATES THE DATE AND TIME WHEN AND THE LOCATION
WHERE THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM WAS SET UP EACH DAY;
(III) SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
(IV) SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION.
(4) (I) A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM SHALL
UNDERGO AN ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT
CALIBRATION LABORATORY THAT IS:
1. SELECTED BY THE COUNTY; AND
2. UNAFFILIATED WITH THE MANUFACTURER OF THE
DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT SHALL BE:
1. KEPT ON FILE; AND

HOUSE BILL 908 11
2. ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT PROCEEDING
FOR A VIOLATION.
(5) A COUNTY THAT ESTABLISHES A DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM PROGRAM SHALL BEAR THE COST OF IMPLEMENTING THE
PROGRAM.
(D) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER OF
A MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS
RECORDED BY A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE BEING
OPERATED DURING THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(2) A PERSON LIABLE FOR A VIOLATION ENFORCED BY A DISTRACTED
DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING
$40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
PRESCRIBE:
(I) A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY, WHICH SHALL BE INDICATED ON THE
CITATION, TO BE PAID BY A PERSON WHO CHOOSES TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
AGENCY SHALL MAIL TO AN OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
(V) THE LOCATION OF THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING
SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 908
(VI) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VII) A COPY OF THE RECORDED IMAGE;
(VIII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY SHOULD BE PAID, IF APPLICABLE;
(IX) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A DULY AUTHORIZED LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER EMPLOYED BY OR UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN AGENCY
THAT, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS
BEING OPERATED DURING THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION;
(X) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION;
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XII) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER, IF APPLICABLE:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL BY THE
ADMINISTRATION TO REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) AN AGENCY MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A PERSON WHO IS NOT
AN OWNER.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C)(1)(IV)2C OF THIS
SECTION, A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER
THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN
THE STATE, AND 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS
REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(4) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:

HOUSE BILL 908 13
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION, DIRECTLY TO THE COUNTY; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(F) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN
SATISFIED, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY A DULY AUTHORIZED LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER EMPLOYED BY OR UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN AGENCY, BASED ON
INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES PRODUCED BY A DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE
CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING ALLEGING A VIOLATION
WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OR TESTIMONY OF THE DISTRACTED DRIVING
MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR WHO PERFORMED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR TO BE PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE
COURT AND THE AGENCY IN WRITING NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(G) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) THAT THE DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM WAS
MALFUNCTIONING AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; OR
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT CONSIDERS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT

HOUSE BILL 908
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(H) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO
REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION.
(I) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE;
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSES
OF § 26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(J) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY AGENCIES, THE
CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION
OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(K) (1) AN AGENCY OR AN AGENT OR A CONTRACTOR DESIGNATED BY THE
AGENCY SHALL ADMINISTER AND PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR IN ANY MANNER OPERATES A DISTRACTED
DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM OR ADMINISTERS OR PROCESSES CITATIONS
GENERATED BY A DISTRACTED DRIVING MONITORING SYSTEM ON BEHALF OF A
COUNTY, THE CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON A PER–TICKET
BASIS ON THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, a county that authorizes a program of distracted driving monitoring systems under
this Act shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly:
(1) on the effectiveness of distracted driving monitoring systems on
improving public safety at the county level and in the specific areas where the systems were
implemented and used; and

HOUSE BILL 908 15
(2) using data collected through October 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.